District of Columbia statutes.
8-801

Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide civil sanctions and to eliminate criminal liability for violating a variety of local laws and rules, to provide for civil enforcement of these violations, and to establish an expeditious administrative adjudicative system.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-100, § 2, 33 DCR 781
This section is referenced in § 1-303.23, § 47-2829, and § 47-2862.
1981 Ed., § 6-2901.
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-100, see Mayor’s Order 86-160, September 19, 1986.
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to DC Law 6-100, the “Litter Control Administration Act of 1985;” DC Law 6-42, the “Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs Civil Infractions Act of 1985;” DC Law 5-165, the “DC Air Pollution Control Act of 1984;” DC Law 13-172, the “Rodent Control Act of 2000;” and DC Law 6-126, the “Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-5, February 1, 2002 ( 49 DCR 911).
D.C. Office of the Clean City Coordinator, see Mayor’s Order 2001-31, March 1, 2001 ( 48 DCR 2383).